Washington statutes.
RCW 36.34.200

Execution of lease agreement.

Upon the decision of the board of county commissioners to lease the lands applied for, a lease shall be executed in duplicate to the lessee by the chair of the board and the county auditor, attested by his or her seal of office, which lease shall also be signed by the lessee. The lease shall refer to the order of the board directing the lease, with a description of the lands conveyed, the periods of payment, and the amounts to be paid for each period.

[ 2009 c 549 s 4074; 1963 c 4 s 36.34.200. Prior: 1901 c 87 s 7; RRS s 4025.]